Nebraska, session 109, LB300.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB300 LB300
2025 2025
Section 1. Section 79-566, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
79-566 The board of education of a Class IV school district shall at
a regular meeting elect from outside its own members a superintendent, an
associate superintendent of instruction, an associate superintendent of
business affairs, a school district treasurer, and the number of
employees the board of education may deem necessary for the proper
conduct of the affairs of the school district at such compensation
salaries as the board of education may determine, except that the
compensation of the superintendent shall comply with the Superintendent
Pay Transparency Act. The board may contract with them for terms not to
exceed three years. The election of all officers of the board of
education and all elections for filling vacancies on the board of
education shall be by ballot. No person shall be declared elected unless
he or she receives the vote of a majority of all the members of the board
of education.
Sec. 2. Section 79-567, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
79-567 The members of the board of education of a Class V school
district, at their regular meeting in January each year, shall elect a
president and vice president from their own members, who shall serve for
terms of one year or until their successors are elected and qualified.
The members of the board of education may also select from outside their
own members one superintendent of public schools, one secretary, one
treasurer, and such other officers as the board may deem necessary for
the administration of the affairs of the school district, at such
compensation salary as the board may deem just, except that the
compensation of the superintendent shall comply with the Superintendent
Pay Transparency Act. The members of the board of education and in their
discretion they may enter into contracts with such officers for terms of
not to exceed three years. The board shall have the power to elect its
-2-

LB300 LB300
2025 2025
president and vice president and to select its officers and employees in
accordance with rules adopted by the board.
Sec. 3. Section 79-594, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
79-594 The school board in a Class I, II, III, or IV school district
may also elect at any regular meeting one superintendent of public
instruction with such compensation salary as the board deems best, except
that such compensation shall comply with the Superintendent Pay
Transparency Act. The board and may enter into contract with the
superintendent him or her at its discretion, for a term not to exceed
three years.
Sec. 4. Section 79-1219, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
79-1219 Each board of an educational service unit deciding to
provide supplementary services shall appoint and fix the compensation and
duties of an administrator, who shall be a person experienced in public
school administration and who shall hold at least a standard
administrative certificate. The board shall fix the compensation of the
administrator, and such compensation shall comply with the Superintendent
Pay Transparency Act. With the advice of the administrator, the board
shall also employ and fix the compensation and duties of such
professional and clerical assistants as shall be necessary. No board
member of an educational service unit shall be employed by the
educational service unit board on which he or she is a board member.
Sec. 5. Section 79-2401, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
79-2401 Sections 79-2401 to 79-2405 and sections 6 and 7 of this act
shall be known and may be cited as the Superintendent Pay Transparency
Act.
Sec. 6. For purposes of the Superintendent Pay Transparency Act:
(1) Benefit means any amount, not included in salary, to be paid
-3-

LB300 LB300
2025 2025
during the contract year or to be paid in the future by a school district
or educational service unit in exchange for the personal services
performed during such contract year resulting in a benefit for the
employee or the family of the employee including, but not limited to, (a)
employer contributions pursuant to the School Employees Retirement Act or
the Class V School Employees Retirement Act, (b) early retirement
inducements as defined in section 79-978 for employees of Class V school
districts and as defined in section 79-902 for employees of all other
school districts and educational service units, (c) cash awards paid by
the school district or educational service unit, (d) severance pay, (e)
employer contributions made for the purpose of separation payments to be
made at retirement, (f) employer contributions to annuities, (g) employer
contributions to group life, health, or disability insurance premiums,
(h) payments made to an employee in lieu of employer contributions to
insurance premiums, and (i) the maximum cash payment for potential unused
leave of any type that could be accrued during such contract year;
(2) Compensation means a reasonable estimate of the total amount of
salary and benefits to be paid by a school district or educational
service unit in exchange for personal services performed during a
contract year;
(3) Compensation for a beginning teacher means compensation expected
to be paid by a school district or educational service unit for the first
year of teaching by a certificated teacher assuming such certificated
teacher receives the maximum benefits generally available to a teacher
who does not receive additional compensation for duties beyond the
standard teaching contract; and
(4) Salary means gross wages to be paid in exchange for personal
services performed during the contract year and includes (a) overtime
pay, (b) member contributions pursuant to the School Employees Retirement
Act or the Class V School Employees Retirement Act, and (c) amounts
contributed to plans under section 125, 403(b), or 457 of the Internal
-4-

LB300 LB300
2025 2025
Revenue Code or any other section of the code which defers or excludes
such amounts from income.
Sec. 7. (1) On and after the effective date of this act, no school
district or educational service unit may enter into any contract with a
superintendent for services to be rendered to a school district or an
administrator for services to be rendered to an educational service unit
if such contract will cause, by the terms of such contract or in
combination with existing contracts, such school district or educational
service unit to pay compensation for any contract year to or on behalf of
such superintendent or administrator in excess of five times the
compensation for a beginning teacher in such school district or
educational service unit for the same contract year.
(2) For purposes of this section:
(a) If a superintendent of a school district also receives
compensation from an educational service unit in which such school
district is a member, such compensation shall be deemed compensation from
such school district; and
(b) If an administrator of an educational service unit receives
compensation from a school district which is a member of such educational
service unit, such compensation shall be deemed compensation from such
educational service unit.
(3) Any contract entered into in violation of this section shall be
invalid, and money belonging to a school district or educational service
unit shall not be expended on such a contract.
(4) Any compensation received by a superintendent or administrator
in violation of the limitations in this section shall be forfeited by
such superintendent or administrator and returned to the school district
or educational service unit, and a notice regarding such excess
compensation shall be filed with the Commissioner of Education within
thirty days after the superintendent, administrator, school board, or
board of the educational service unit becomes aware of such violation.
-5-

LB300 LB300
2025 2025
Sec. 8. Section 79-2402, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
79-2402 (1) Before the school board of any school district or the
board of any educational service unit approves a proposed contract, or
any proposed amendment to an existing contract, for future superintendent
services to be rendered to such school district by the current
superintendent or future administrator services to be rendered to such
educational service unit by the current administrator, the board shall
publish a copy of such proposed contract or amendment, and a reasonable
estimate and description of all current and future costs to the school
district or educational service unit if the proposed contract or
amendment were to be approved, and the maximum total compensation allowed
for the superintendent or administrator pursuant to section 7 of this act
at least three days before the meeting of the board at which such
proposed contract or amendment will be considered. Such publication shall
also specify the date, time, and place of the public meeting at which the
proposed contract or amendment will be considered. Electronic publication
on the website of the school district or educational service unit shall
satisfy the requirement of this subsection if such electronic publication
is prominently displayed and allows public access to the entire proposed
contract or amendment and all other information required by this section.
(2) After the school board of any school district or the board of
any educational service unit approves a contract for future
superintendent services to be rendered to such school district by a new
superintendent or future administrator services to be rendered to such
educational service unit by a new administrator, the board shall publish
a copy of such contract, and a reasonable estimate and description of all
current and future costs to the school district or educational service
unit that will be incurred as a result of such contract, within two days
after the meeting of the board at which such contract was approved.
Electronic publication on the website of the school district or
-6-

LB300 LB300
2025 2025
educational service unit shall satisfy the requirement of this subsection
if such electronic publication is prominently displayed and allows public
access to the entire contract.
Sec. 9. Original sections 79-566, 79-567, 79-594, 79-1219, 79-2401,
and 79-2402, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, are repealed.
-7-